Louisiana, session 2026, SB471.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:261 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§261. Child Welfare Death Review Panel
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Protection of the health and welfare of the children of this state is a
goal of its people, and child fatalities and the unexpected deaths of children in
the custody or care of the department are important public health concerns that
require legislative action.
(2) Collecting data on the causes of child fatalities and unexpected deaths
of children in the custody or care of the department will better enable the state
to protect some children from preventable deaths and will help reduce the
incidence of such deaths.
(3) Multiagency reviews of child fatalities and unexpected deaths of
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1353 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 471
children in the custody or care of the department can assist the state in the
investigation of child fatalities and unexpected deaths of children in the custody
or care of the department, in the development of a greater understanding of the
incidence and causes of child fatalities and unexpected deaths of children in the
custody or care of the department and the methods for preventing such deaths,
and in identifying gaps in services to children and families.
(4) The purpose of this Section is to identify the cause of child fatalities
and unexpected deaths of children in the custody or care of the department, and
thereby reduce the incidence of injury and death to children by requiring that
a death investigation be performed in the case of all child fatalities and
unexpected deaths of children in the custody or care of the department, and
establishing the Louisiana Child Welfare Death Review Panel to collect data
from such investigations to identify patterns and systemic problems to support
corrective actions and quality improvements in service delivery.
B. For the purpose of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meaning:
(1) "Child fatality" means the death of an individual under the age of
eighteen in which abuse or neglect was medically determined by an examining
physician to be a contributing factor in the cause of death.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family
Services.
(3) "Unexpected death" means the death of an individual under the age
of eighteen that is a result of undiagnosed disease, or trauma in which the
surrounding circumstances are suspicious, obscure, or otherwise unexplained,
or other death the circumstances of which are suspicious, obscure, or otherwise
unexplained.
C. There is established within the department the Louisiana Child
Welfare Death Review Panel, hereinafter referred to as the "review panel",
which shall be composed of sixteen persons. Members of the panel shall include:
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1353 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 471
(1) The secretary of the department or his designee.
(2) The assistant secretary of child welfare of the department or his
designee.
(3) The chief medical director of the department.
(4) The superintendent of the office of state police or his designee.
(5) The president of the Senate or his designee.
(6) The speaker of the House of Representatives or his designee.
(7) The assistant secretary of the office of behavioral health of the
Louisiana Department of Health or his designee.
(8) The assistant secretary of the office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of the Louisiana Department of Health or his designee.
(9) A forensic pathologist certified by the American Board of Pathology
and licensed to practice medicine in the state appointed by the chairman of the
Louisiana Child Welfare Death Review Panel.
(10) A pathologist experienced in pediatrics appointed by the Louisiana
Pathology Society.
(11) A coroner appointed by the president of the Louisiana Coroner's
Association.
(12) Two persons appointed by the governor, subject to Senate
confirmation, for a term of three years as follows:
(a) A health professional with expertise in Sudden Infant Death
Syndrome appointed from a list of three names submitted by the Louisiana
State Medical Society.
(b) A pediatrician with experience in diagnosing and treating child abuse
and neglect appointed from a list of three names submitted by the state chapter
of the American Academy of Pediatrics.
(13) The state superintendent of education or his designee.
(14) The director of the bureau of emergency medical services of the
Louisiana Department of Health or his designee.
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1353 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 471
(15) The state child ombudsman or his designee.
D.(1) The review panel shall:
(a) Review child fatalities and unexpected deaths of children in the
custody or care of the department.
(b) Obtain data and records relevant to the causes and circumstances of
death from providers, including healthcare providers, as well as from other
sources.
(c) Identify patterns and systemic problems to determine what changes,
if any, should be made in service delivery.
(2) The review panel may analyze any data available through any state
systems that may decrease the incidence of injury and unexpected death to
children.
E.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
review panel shall be authorized to access medical and vital records in the
custody of physicians, hospitals, clinics, other healthcare providers, and the
office of public health, and any other information, documents, or records
pertaining to the completed investigation of child fatalities and unexpected
deaths of children in the custody or care of the department and in the custody
of any law enforcement agency in order that it may perform its functions and
duties as provided in this Section.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, including
but not limited to the provisions of Children's Code Article 615 and R.S. 46:56,
all of the following authorizations shall be effective when a child fatality or an
unexpected death of a child in the custody or care of the department has
occurred:
(a) The review panel, in order that it may perform its functions and
duties as provided in Subsection D of this Section, is authorized to have access
to any information, documents, or records in the possession of the department
involving a child abuse and neglect investigation which are pertinent to the
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1353 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 471
review of a child fatality or unexpected death of a child in the custody or care
of the department.
(b) All records obtained by the review panel or its agent in accordance
with the provisions of this Section shall be confidential and shall not be
available for subpoena nor shall such information be disclosed, discoverable, or
compelled to be produced in any civil, criminal, administrative, or other
proceeding nor shall such records be deemed admissible as evidence in any civil,
criminal, administrative, or other tribunal or court for any reason.
(3) The furnishing of confidential information, documents, and reports
in accordance with this Section by any person, agency, or entity furnishing such
information, documents, and reports shall not expose such person, agency, or
entity to liability and shall not be considered a violation of any privileged or
confidential relationship, provided the participant has acted in good faith in the
reporting as required in this Section.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.